New York, session 2025-2026, S10072.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13-0340-c of the environmental conservation law, as 2 amended by chapter 321 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 13-0340-c. Winter flounder (Pleuorenectes americanus). 5 The department may, until December thirty-first, two thousand [twen- 6 ty-six] twenty-nine, fix by regulation measures for the management of 7 winter flounder (Pleuorenectes americanus), including size limits, catch 8 and possession limits, open and closed seasons, closed areas, 9 restrictions on the manner of taking and landing, requirements for 10 permits and eligibility therefor, recordkeeping requirements, require- 11 ments on the amount and type of fishing effort and gear, and require- 12 ments relating to transportation, possession and sale, provided that 13 such regulations are no less restrictive than requirements set forth in 14 this chapter and provided further that such regulations are consistent 15 with the compliance requirements of applicable fishery management plans 16 adopted by the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission and with 17 applicable provisions of fishery management plans adopted pursuant to 18 the Federal Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C. § 1800 et 19 seq.). 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14998-01-6